Utah statutes.
77-30-23.   Fugitives from this state -- Applications for requisition for
return.
(1)  When the return to this state of a person charged with a crime in this
state is required, the prosecuting attorney shall present to the governor his
written application for a requisition for the return of the person charged, in
which application shall be stated the name of the person so charged, the crime
charged against him, the approximate time, place, and circumstances of its
commission, the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of
the accused therein at the time the application is made, and certifying that
in the opinion of the said prosecuting attorney the ends of justice require
the arrest and return of the accused to this state for trial and that the
proceeding is not instituted to enforce a private claim.
(2)  When the return to this state is required of a person who has been
convicted of a crime in this state and has escaped from confinement or broken
the terms of his bail, probation, or parole, the prosecuting attorney of the
county in which the offense was committed, the parole board, or the warden of
the institution or sheriff of the county from which escape was made shall
present to the governor a written application for a requisition for the return
of such person, in which application shall be stated the name of the person,
the crime of which he was convicted, the circumstances of his escape from
confinement, or of the breach of the terms of his bail, probation, or parole,
the state in which he is believed to be, including the location of the person
therein at the time application is made.
(3)  The application shall be verified by affidavit, shall be executed in
duplicate, and shall be accompanied by two certified copies of the indictment
returned, or information and affidavit filed, or of the complaint made to the
judge or magistrate stating the offense with which the accused is charged, or
of the judgment or conviction, or of the sentence.
(4)  The prosecuting officer, parole board, warden, or sheriff may also attach
such further affidavits and other documents in duplicate as he shall deem
proper to be submitted with such application.  One copy of the application
with the action of the governor indicated by endorsement thereon and one of
the certified copies of the indictment, complaint, information, and affidavits
or of the judgment of conviction or of the sentence shall be filed in the
office of the governor to remain of record in that office.  The other copies
of all papers shall be forwarded with the governor's requisition.
